Hawaii, session 2025, HB1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a better understanding of carbon sequestration potential and the location and temperature of underground water resources across the State can have multiple benefits to agriculture, clean energy, and land use. The legislature further finds that resource characterization via slim-hole bores, which have a diameter of seven inches or less for over ninety per cent of the depth of the bore, can identify water and carbon sequestration resources across the State. The legislature additionally finds that a statewide environmental assessment of a slim-hole exploration program should be conducted, along with robust and continued community engagement, to identify the most appropriate locations for this scientific activity. The purpose of this Act is to require the department of business, economic development, and tourism to implement a carbon sequestration, underground water, and geothermal exploration resource characterization program that identifies the location and characteristics of underground water and carbon sequestration resources across the State and, in collaboration with the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii, conduct an environmental assessment of the program's actions and implement the program. SECTION 2. Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-     Carbon sequestration, underground water, and geothermal exploration resource characterization program.  (a) There is established the carbon sequestration, underground water, and geothermal exploration resource characterization program within the department of business, economic development, and tourism to identify the location and characteristics of underground water and carbon sequestration resources across the State using the slim-hole boring exploration method.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall implement the program, which shall include conducting a statewide environmental assessment of the program's actions pursuant to chapter 343, in collaboration with the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii or similar institution. (b) Before and during the statewide environmental assessment for the carbon sequestration, underground water, and geothermal exploration resource characterization program activities, the department of business, economic development, and tourism and collaborators shall meet with the counties and nearby communities, including individuals and civic organizations, to explain the purpose of the program and identify community needs, priorities, concerns, and appropriate locations to conduct the slim-hole boring for the program." SECTION 3.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall submit a progress report on the carbon sequestration, underground water, and geothermal exploration resource characterization program, including its findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. The report shall be made available to the public in readily accessible formats, including commonly used mapping software. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the energy security special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of       full-time equivalent (      FTE) permanent positions to support the activities described by this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.